Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2537.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9(b)(1) of the act of January 8, 1960 (1959 P.L.2119, No.787), known as the Air Pollution Control Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 9. Penalties.--* * *123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 (b) (1) [Any] Except as provided in subsection (b.1), any person who wilfully or negligently violates any provision of this act, any rule or regulation adopted under this act or any order of the department or any condition or term of any plan approval or permit issued pursuant to this act commits a misdemeanor of the second degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) for each separate offense or to imprisonment for a period of not more than two (2) years for each separate offense, or both.* * *(b.1) (1) Any person who wilfully or negligently violates any provision of this act, any rule or regulation adopted under this act or any order of the department or any condition or term of any plan approval or permit issued pursuant to this act as it relates to malodors commits a misdemeanor of the second degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than the following for each separate offense:(i) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for a first violation.(ii) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for a second violation.(iii) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for a third violation.(2) If thirty (30) days have elapsed from the notice to a person regarding a third violation under clause (1) and the person has not resolved the causes of the malodors that led to the violation, the person shall cease operations until the malodor violation is resolved.(3) If a person is required to cease operations under clause 20260HB2537PN3437 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) and the person subsequently resolves the malodor violation pending the approval of the department, the person may continue operations.(4) If a person receives notice of an additional malodor violation after continuing operations in accordance with clause (3), the person shall be subject to the penalties under clauses (1) and (2).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2537PN3437 - 3 - 123456789